District of Columbia statutes.
34-603

Rates to be in force and to be prima facie reasonable.

All rates, tolls, charges, time and condition of payment thereof, schedules, and joint rates fixed by the Commission shall be in force and shall be prima facie reasonable until finally found otherwise in an action brought for that purpose.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 988, ch. 150, § 8, par. 63
1973 Ed., § 43-703.
1981 Ed., § 43-903.